North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10 The State Board of Higher Education

15-10-01.
State board of higher education — Institutions administered by board.

The state board of higher education shall have the control and administration of the following state educational institutions:

The state university and the school of mines at Grand Forks, with their substations.

The North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science and the agricultural experiment station at Fargo, with their substations or centers.

The school of science at Wahpeton.

The Valley City state university, Mayville state university, Minot state university, and Dickinson state university.

The following colleges: Bismarck state college, Dakota college at Bottineau, Lake Region state college, and Williston state college.

And such other state institutions of higher education as may be established.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 1, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 499, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 15-1001; S.L. 1973, ch. 131, § 1; 1983, ch. 192, § 1; 1987, ch. 3, § 13; 1987, ch. 197, § 1; 1989, ch. 34, § 15; 1999, ch. 439, § 1; 2009, ch. 155, § 1.

Cross-References.

Board of Higher Education, see N.D. Const., art. VIII, § 6.

Experiment stations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 4-05 and N.D.C.C. § 15-12-10.

School of forestry, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-16.

School of science, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-15.

State normal schools, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-13.

State university and school of mines, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-11.

State university of agriculture and applied science, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-12.

15-10-01.1.
Board of higher education to assume jurisdiction over junior colleges and off-campus educational centers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-01.2.
North Dakota university system — Unified system of higher education.

The institutions of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education are a unified system of higher education, as established by the board, and are designated as the North Dakota university system.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 159, § 1.

15-10-02.
Membership of state board of higher education — Advisers.

The state board of higher education consists of eight members, all of whom must be appointed by the governor in accordance with section 6 of article VIII of the Constitution of North Dakota.

The council of college faculties shall annually appoint one individual to serve as an adviser to the state board. The adviser may attend and participate in all meetings of the state board but may not vote.

The staff senate annually shall appoint one individual to serve as an adviser to the state board. The adviser may attend and participate in all meetings of the state board but may not vote.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 2, subs. a, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 499; R.C. 1943, § 15-1002; S.L. 1977, ch. 145, § 1; 1983, ch. 193, § 1; 1991, ch. 159, § 1; 1991, ch. 160, § 1; 1993, ch. 162, § 1; 1999, ch. 154, § 1; 2011, ch. 116, § 1.

15-10-03.
Terms of office. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-04.
Failure of senate to confirm nomination to board — Procedure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-05.
Appointments to fill vacancies when legislative assembly not in session. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-06.
Removal — Impeachment only. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-07.
Oath of office — Quorum.

Before entering upon the duties of their offices, the members appointed to the state board of higher education shall take and subscribe the oath required of civil officers. A majority of the members appointed to the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 15-1007.

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers, see

N.D. Const., art. XI, § 4, and N.D.C.C.§ 44-01-05.

15-10-08.
Compensation of board members — Expenses — Legislative appropriations.

Each member of the state board of higher education, except the student member, is entitled to receive as compensation one hundred forty-eight dollars per day for each calendar day actually spent devoted to the duties of office, and necessary expenses in the same manner and amounts as other state officials for attending meetings and performing other functions of office. The legislative assembly shall provide adequate funds to carry out the functions and duties of the board.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, §§ 4, 5, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 500; R.C. 1943, § 15-1008; S.L. 1977, ch. 146, § 1; 1997, ch. 155, § 1; 1997, ch. 432, § 11; 2003, ch. 3, § 33; 2011, ch. 3, § 16.

15-10-09.
President and secretary of board — Appointment — Term.

The state board of higher education shall elect one of its members annually to serve as president of the board for a term of one year. It shall elect a competent person as secretary, who shall hold office at the will of the board and shall reside, during the secretary’s term of office, in the city of Bismarck.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 6, subs. a, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 501; R.C. 1943, § 15-1009.

15-10-10.
State commissioner of higher education — Qualification — Appointment — Term — Removal.

The state board of higher education, as soon as practicable, shall appoint, for a term of not to exceed three years, a state commissioner of higher education whose principal office must be at the state capitol. The commissioner of higher education is responsible to the board and is removable by the board for cause. The commissioner must be a graduate of some reputable college or university who by training and experience is familiar with the problems peculiar to higher education. The commissioner must be the chief executive officer of the board and shall perform such duties as must be prescribed by it.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 7, subss. a, b, c, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 502; R.C. 1943, § 15-1010.

Cross-References.

State board for Indian scholarships, commissioner as member, see N.D.C.C. § 15-63-01.

15-10-11.
Authority and general powers of board.

The state board of higher education has full authority over the institutions under its control with the right to prescribe, limit, or modify the courses offered at the several institutions. In furtherance of its powers, the board has the power to delegate to its employees details of the administration of the institutions under its control. The board has authority to organize or reorganize, within constitutional and statutory limitations, the work of each institution under its control, and to do everything necessary and proper for the efficient and economical administration thereof.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 6, subs. 6, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 501; R.C. 1943, § 15-1011.

15-10-12.
Board may accept gifts and bequests — Deposit of funds. (Effective after June 30, 2013)

The state board of higher education may, subject to the limitations of section 15-10-12.1, receive donations, gifts, grants, and bequests offered or tendered to or for the benefit of any institution of higher education under its control or subject to its administration, and all moneys coming into the hands of the board as donations, gifts, grants, and bequests must be used for the specific purpose for which they are donated or given. A special revenue fund, for each institution of higher education under the control of the board or subject to its administration, must be maintained within the state treasury and all institutional income from tuition collections must be placed in the special fund for the use of the institution for which the money was raised. All rent, interest, or income from land, money, or property, donated or granted by the United States and allocated to specific institutions of higher learning under the terms of the Enabling Act and the Constitution of North Dakota must be deposited in the special revenue fund of each institution and expended in accordance with section 1 of article IX of the Constitution of North Dakota. Moneys in the special revenue fund are subject to legislative appropriations. All other funds, unless restricted by the terms of a grant, donation, or bequest, received by the institutions from federal, state, and local grants and contracts, indirect cost recoveries, special student fees, room and board fees and other auxiliary enterprise fees, student activity fees, continuing education program fees, internal service fund revenues, and all other revenues must be deposited in the institution special revenue funds. The state treasurer shall immediately transfer the funds deposited in the special revenue funds to institution accounts in the Bank of North Dakota. Biennial estimates of revenue and expenditures of the other funds by source of funds must be presented at the same time biennial budget requests for appropriations from the special revenue fund and state general fund are prepared and submitted to the office of the budget. Payments from each institution’s general fund appropriation must be made in amounts as may be necessary for the operation and maintenance of each institution, except that at the close of the biennium the balance of funds not paid from the general fund appropriation must be deposited in the special revenue funds of the institutions. All such appropriations are subject to proration in the same manner as other appropriations are prorated if insufficient funds are available to meet expenditures from the general fund. Sinking funds for the payment of interest and principal of institutional revenue bonds must be deposited pursuant to section 15-55-06.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 89, §§ 13, 16; R.C. 1899, § 981; R.C. 1905, § 1178; C.L. 1913, § 1731; R.C. 1943, § 15-1012; S.L. 1965, ch. 120, § 2; 1969, ch. 155, § 1; 1971, ch. 164, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 19; 1983, ch. 555, § 1; 1995, ch. 3, § 14; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2001, ch. 28, § 24; 2003, ch. 3, § 34; 2005, ch. 139, § 1; 2007, ch. 152, § 1; 2009, ch. 157, § 1; 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Cross-References.

Authority for devises, bequests, legacies, and gifts to state institutions, see N.D.C.C.§ 1-08-02.

Validating devises, bequests, legacies, and gifts to state institutions, see N.D.C.C.§ 1-08-03.

15-10-12.1.
Acceptance of buildings and campus improvements — Legislative approval.

The state board of higher education may authorize campus improvements and building maintenance on land under the control of the board which are financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests if the cost of the improvement or building maintenance is not more than seven hundred thousand dollars. The consent of the legislative assembly is required for construction of any building or any addition to a building on land under the control of the board which is financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests. The consent of the legislative assembly is required for campus improvements or building maintenance financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests if the cost of the improvements or maintenance is more than seven hundred thousand dollars. During the time the legislative assembly is not in session, except for the six months preceding the convening of a regular session and the three months following the close of a regular session, and unless otherwise restricted by previous legislative action or other law, the budget section may authorize the use of land under the control of the board and construct buildings financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests and campus improvements and building maintenance financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests if the cost of the improvement or maintenance is more than seven hundred thousand dollars. Any project request submitted to the budget section for the construction of a building financed by donations, gifts, grants, and bequests must include the removal of a building or buildings with an equivalent or greater total number of square feet compared to the proposed building. The budget section approval must comply with section 54-35-02.9 and must include a specific dollar limit for each building, campus improvement project or maintenance project. The state board of higher education may authorize the sale of any real property or buildings which an institution of higher learning has received by gift or bequest. The board shall prescribe such conditions for the sale of the property as it determines necessary. The conditions must include requiring an appraisal and public auction or advertisement for bids, unless the gift instrument requires a different process. If the state board of higher education submits a request for campus improvements, building maintenance, or to construct buildings under this section to the budget section for approval, the legislative council shall notify each member of the legislative assembly of the date of the budget section meeting at which the request will be considered and provide a copy of the meeting agenda to each member of the legislative assembly. The chairman of the budget section shall allow any member of the legislative assembly an opportunity to present testimony to the budget section regarding any such request.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 164, § 2; 1983, ch. 82, § 20; 1997, ch. 156, § 1; 1999, ch. 156, § 1; 2001, ch. 160, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2013, ch. 357, § 1; 2017, ch. 123, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 3, § 7, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 438, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

15-10-12.2.
College and university investment income.

All income earned on college and university funds not deposited in the state treasury must be retained by those funds.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 578, § 2.

15-10-12.3.
Capital construction projects — Local fund sources — Local matching funds — Report to budget section.

If any institution under the control of the state board of higher education undertakes a capital construction project, including any renovation or expansion, with the approval of the legislative assembly, all local funds to be used for the project must be derived from sources that have been presented to and approved by the legislative assembly or the budget section pursuant to section 15-10-12.1. The source of any local matching funds required for state-funded or bonded projects must be funds raised and designated for the project and may not include funding from the state general fund, state and federal grant and contract funds, tuition or fees, endowment or investment income, institutional sales and services income including indirect and administrative costs, or transfers or loans from other institutions’ funds or agency funds unless the institution has received prior approval from the legislative assembly or from the budget section pursuant to section 15-10-12.1. Each institution undertaking a capital construction project that was approved by the legislative assembly and for which local funds are to be used shall present a biennial report to the budget section of the legislative management detailing the source of all funds used in the capital construction project, including local funds. This section applies to projects approved after July 1, 2001.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 15, § 24; 2009, ch. 482, § 98.

15-10-13.
Faculties of institutions under supervision of state board of higher education — Rules and regulations.

In each institution of higher education under the control and subject to the administration of the state board of higher education, the faculty shall consist of the president, instructors, teachers, and assistants. The faculty shall adopt, subject to such rules and regulations as the state board of higher education may establish, all necessary rules and regulations for the government of the school.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 158, § 4; 1890, ch. 160, § 10; 1891, ch. 89, § 17; R.C. 1895, §§ 917, 926, 942; S.L. 1897, ch. 89, §§ 17, 18; R.C. 1899, §§ 917, 926, 942, 982; S.L. 1903, ch. 50, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 1086, 1095, 1108, 1179; S.L. 1907, ch. 240, § 5; 1911, ch. 61, § 13; C.L. 1913, §§ 1590, 1599, 1612, 1732; R.C. 1943, § 15-1013.

15-10-13.1.
Faculty — English language proficiency.

Any professor, instructor, teacher, assistant, or graduate assistant at a state institution of higher education must exhibit written and verbal proficiency in the English language. Any deficiency must be remedied by special training or coursework provided by the institution.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 198, § 1; 1993, ch. 163, § 1.

15-10-13.2.
Public institutions of higher education — Faculty members — Oath or affirmation.

Before entering upon the discharge of duties, every faculty member employed by an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education shall take the following oath or affirmation:

The faculty member shall execute the oath or affirmation in duplicate. One copy of the oath or affirmation must be filed with the state board of higher education. The faculty member shall retain the other copy.

I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the state of North Dakota, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of my position, according to the best of my ability.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 2.

15-10-13.3.
Public institutions of higher education — Alien faculty members — Oath or affirmation.

Before entering upon the discharge of duties, an individual who is not a citizen of the United States but who is a faculty member employed by an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education shall take an oath or affirmation to support the institutions and policies of the United States during the period of the individual’s employment within the state.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 3.

15-10-14.
Accounts and records of institutions — Examination and audit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-10-14.1.
Higher education reports.

The state board of higher education shall submit the reports required pursuant to section 15-10-14.2 and such other reports as may be requested by the legislative assembly or governor.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 132, § 2; 1975, ch. 466, § 10; 1995, ch. 350, § 10; 1999, ch. 157, § 1.

15-10-14.2.
Higher education system strategic plan — Reports.

The state board of higher education shall adopt a strategic planning process and develop a strategic plan to define and prioritize university system goals and objectives. The board shall provide an annual performance and accountability report regarding performance and progress toward the goals outlined in the university system’s strategic plan and accountability measures.

The state board of higher education shall report to the legislative assembly during each regular legislative session regarding the status of higher education in this state.

Student performance on nationally recognized examinations in their major fields compared to the national averages.

First-time licensure pass rates compared to other states.

Alumni-reported and student-reported satisfaction with preparation in selected major, acquisition of specific skills, and technology knowledge and abilities.

Employer-reported satisfaction with preparation of recently hired graduates.

Biennial report on employee satisfaction relating to the university system and local institutions.

Student graduation and retention rates.

Student access, including number and proportion of enrollments in courses offered by nontraditional methods.

Student affordability, including:

Tuition and fees on a per student basis compared to the regional average.

Tuition and fees as a percentage of median North Dakota household income.

Cost per student in terms of general fund appropriations and total university system funding.

Per capita general fund appropriations for higher education.

State general fund appropriation levels for university system institutions compared to peer institutions general fund appropriation levels.

Financial operations, including:

Cost per student and percentage distribution by major function.

Ratio measuring the funding derived from operating and contributed income compared to total university system funding.

Ratio measuring the amount of expendable net assets as compared to the amount of long-term debt.

Research expenditures in proportion to the amount of revenue generated by research activity and funding received for research activity.

Ratio measuring the amount of expendable fund balances divided by total expenditures and mandatory transfers.

Ratio measuring net total revenues divided by total current revenues.”

Student graduation and retention rates.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 193, § 1; 1991, ch. 600, § 1; 1995, ch. 166, § 1; 1995, ch. 167, § 1; 1999, ch. 158, § 1; 2001, ch. 159, § 2.

Note.

Section 17 of chapter 1003, S.L. 2007, effective July 1, 2007, provides:

“LEGISLATIVE INTENT — HIGHER EDUCATION ACCOUNTABILITY MEASURES.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the state board of higher education’s performance and accountability report as required by section 15-10-14.2 include an executive summary and information regarding:

1.

Education excellence, including:

2.

Economic development, including:

a.

Enrollment in entrepreneurship courses and the number of graduates of entrepreneurship programs.

b.

Percentage of university system graduates obtaining employment appropriate to their education in the state.

c.

Number of businesses and employees in the region receiving training.

Section 18 of chapter 3, S.L. 2003, effective July 1, 2003, provides:

“LEGISLATIVE INTENT — HIGHER EDUCATION ACCOUNTABILITY MEASURES.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the board of higher education’s performance and accountability report as required by section 15-10-14.2 include an executive summary and information regarding:

1.

Education excellence, including:

a.

Student performance on nationally recognized exams in their major fields compared to the national averages.

b.

First-time licensure pass rates compared to other states.

c.

Alumni-reported and student-reported satisfaction with preparation in selected major, acquisition of specific skills, and technology knowledge and abilities.

d.

Employer-reported satisfaction with preparation of recently hired graduates.

e.

Biennial report on employee satisfaction relating to the university system and local institutions.

f.

Ratio of faculty and staff to students.

2.

Economic development, including:

a.

Enrollment in entrepreneurship courses and the number of graduates of entrepreneurship programs.

b.

Percentage of university system graduates obtaining employment appropriate to their education in the state.

c.

Number of businesses and employees in the region receiving training.

3.

Student access, including:

a.

Proportion of residents of the state who are within a forty-five-minute drive of a location at which they can receive educational programs from a provider.

b.

Number and proportion of enrollments in courses offered by nontraditional methods.

4.

Student affordability, including:

a.

Tuition and fees on a per student basis compared to the regional average.

b.

Tuition and fees as a percentage of median North Dakota household income.

c.

Cost per student in terms of general fund appropriations and total university system funding.

d.

Administrative, instructional, and other cost per student.

e.

Per capita general fund appropriations for higher education.

f.

State general fund appropriation levels for university system institutions compared to peer institutions general fund appropriation levels.

5.

Financial operations, including:

a.

Percentage of total university system funding used for instruction, research, and public service.

b.

Percentage of total university system funding used for institutional support, operations, and maintenance of physical plant.

c.

Ratio measuring the funding derived from operating and contributed income compared to total university system funding.

d.

Deferred maintenance ratio measuring the size of the university system’s outstanding maintenance as compared to its expendable net assets.

e.

Viability ratio measuring the amount of expendable net assets as compared to the amount of long-term debt.

f.

Research expenditures in proportion to the amount of revenue generated by research activity and funding received for research activity.

g.

New construction and major renovation capital projects for which specific appropriations are made, including budget to actual comparison, use of third-party funding, and related debt.”

15-10-15.
Budget requests — Duties of institution heads. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-10-16.
Control of funds and appropriations of educational institutions.

The state board of higher education has the control of the expenditure of the funds belonging and allocated to the institutions under its control and also of those appropriated by the legislative assembly for such institutions, but funds appropriated by the legislative assembly and specifically designated for any one or more of such institutions may not be used for any other institution.

Source:

N.D. Const. Amd. Art. 54, § 6, subs. e, June 28, 1938, S.L. 1939, p. 502; R.C. 1943, § 15-1016.

Cross-References.

Expenditure of amount in excess of appropriation unlawful, see N.D.C.C.§ 54-27-12.

15-10-16.1.
Loans from Bank of North Dakota.

Institutions under the board of higher education are authorized to borrow, and the Bank of North Dakota is authorized to loan to those institutions, amounts not to exceed ninety percent of the value of an institution’s certificate of deposit held by the Bank. The term of the loan may not exceed the term of the certificate of deposit offered as security for the loan. The loans are subject to such additional terms and conditions as may be established by the Bank.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 155, § 2.